Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. Real Estate Commission.

Administrative Code. —

For real estate commission, see 12 AAC 64.

Sec. 08.88.010.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.011.
Creation and membership of commission.

There is created a Real Estate Commission.
It consists of seven members.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 9 ch 258 SLA 1976)

Sec. 08.88.020.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.021.
Appointment and term of office. [Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987. For current law, see AS 08.01.035.]

Sec. 08.88.026.
Terms of office. [Repealed, § 20 ch 80 SLA 1996. For current law, see AS 39.05.053.]

Sec. 08.88.030.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.031.
Executive secretary of commission.

The department shall, after consultation with the commission, employ a person, who is not a member of the commission, to serve as executive secretary for the commission. The executive secretary shall perform duties as assigned by the commission and may use the title “executive administrator” when performing the duties.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 28 SLA 1974; am § 56 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 167 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 74 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 47 SLA 1999)

Sec. 08.88.034.
Investigator of the commission. [Repealed, § 9 ch 74 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 08.88.037.
Investigation and injunction.

The commission may request the department to conduct investigations to determine whether a person has violated a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted under it, or to secure information useful in the administration of this chapter.

If it appears to the department that a person has engaged in or is about to engage in an act or practice in violation of a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted under it and that action is warranted in the public interest, the department shall notify all commission members by telephone or facsimile of a proposed order or action, and, if a majority of the members of the commission approve, the department may

after reasonable notice of and an opportunity for a hearing is given to the person, issue an order directing the person to stop the act or practice; the department may issue a temporary order before a hearing is held; a temporary order remains in effect until a final order affirming, modifying, or reversing the temporary order is issued or until 15 days have elapsed after the person receives the notice and has not requested a hearing; a temporary order becomes final if the person to whom the notice is addressed does not request a hearing within 15 days after receiving the notice; if a hearing is requested, a hearing shall be conducted by a hearing officer within 30 days; the commission shall issue a final order within 10 days after the hearing;

bring an action in superior court to enjoin the act or practice and to enforce compliance with this chapter, a regulation adopted under it, or an order issued under it;

examine or have examined the books and records of a person whose business activities require licensure under this chapter and the department may require the person to pay the reasonable costs of the examination; and

issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses, and the production of books, records, and other documents.

History.

(§ 2 ch 167 SLA 1980; am § 6 ch 74 SLA 1987; am § 6 ch 30 SLA 1992; am § 32 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For investigations on the department’s own motion, see AS

08.01.087

.

Administrative Code. —

For prohibited conduct, see 12 AAC 64, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in the introductory language in (b), deleted “, telegraph,” following “commission members by telephone”.

Sec. 08.88.040.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.041.
Qualifications of commission members.

Five members of the commission must be real estate brokers or associate brokers who have been licensed real estate brokers or licensed associate brokers in the state for at least three years before appointment. Two members of the commission must be public members in accordance with AS

08.01.025

.

Of the five members of the commission who must be real estate brokers or associate brokers, one member shall be from the First Judicial District, one shall be from the Second Judicial District, one shall be from the Third Judicial District, one shall be from the Fourth Judicial District and one shall be from the state at large. However, if no licensed real estate broker or licensed associate broker is eligible or available for appointment from the Second Judicial District, then two licensed real estate brokers or licensed associate brokers shall be appointed from the state at large.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 130 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 14 SLA 1972; am § 10 ch 258 SLA 1976; am § 3 ch 167 SLA 1980; am § 6 ch 32 SLA 1997; am § 33 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in the first sentence of (a), substituted “the state” for “Alaska”.

Sec. 08.88.050.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.051.
Commission meetings and officers.

The commission shall hold a regular annual meeting. It may hold a special meeting at the call of the chairman or at the request of three commission members.

At least two judicial districts shall be represented and at least a majority of the commission members shall be present in order to conduct business.

The commission shall elect its officers at the first meeting of each fiscal year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 2 ch 130 SLA 1966; am § 11 ch 258 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 45 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For examinations, see 12 AAC 64, art. 1.

Sec. 08.88.060.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.061.
Assistants.

Notwithstanding contrary provisions of AS

08.01.050

, the commission may assign or designate assistants to

issue licenses to applicants who meet the qualifications for licensure established under this chapter;

prepare questions on examinations;

administer and grade examinations;

certify courses required under this chapter;

approve instructors to teach courses required under this chapter; and

negotiate terms for payment of fines and other money due under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 57 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 4 ch 167 SLA 1980; am § 7 ch 74 SLA 1987; am § 3 ch 45 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For real estate education standards, see 12 AAC 64, art. 7.

Sec. 08.88.070.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.071.
Duties and powers of the commission; grounds for disciplinary sanctions.

The commission shall

determine whether applicants meet requirements for licenses under this chapter and issue licenses to those who qualify;

prepare and grade examinations;

after hearing, have the authority to suspend or revoke the license of a licensee or impose other disciplinary sanctions authorized under AS

08.01.075

on a licensee who

with respect to a real estate transaction

made a substantial misrepresentation;

made a false promise likely to influence, persuade, or induce;

in the case of a real estate broker, pursued a flagrant course of misrepresentation or made a false promise through another real estate licensee;

has engaged in conduct that is fraudulent or dishonest;

violates AS

08.88.391

;

violates AS

08.88.396

;

procures a license by deceiving the commission, or aids another to do so;

has engaged in conduct of which the commission did not have knowledge at the time the licensee was licensed demonstrating the licensee’s unfitness to engage in the business for which the licensee is licensed;

knowingly authorizes, directs, connives at, or aids in publishing, distributing, or circulating a material false statement or misrepresentation concerning the licensee’s business or concerning real estate offered for sale, rent, or lease, or managed in the course of the licensee’s business in this or any other state or concerning the management of an association in the course of a licensee’s business in this or another state;

if a real estate broker, wilfully violates AS

08.88.171(d)

or

08.88.291

;

if an associate real estate broker, claims to be a real estate broker, or, if a real estate salesperson, claims to be a real estate broker or associate real estate broker;

if a real estate broker, employs an unlicensed person to perform activities for which a real estate license is required;

if an employed real estate licensee of a real estate broker, fails immediately to turn money or other property collected in a real estate transaction over to the employing real estate broker; or

fails to carry and maintain errors and omissions insurance with terms and conditions established by the commission under AS

08.88.172

;

prosecute, through the Department of Law, violations of the provisions of this chapter or lawful regulations adopted under this chapter;

release for publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the locale of the offending person’s principal office registered with the commission notice of disciplinary action taken by the commission against a person licensed under this chapter;

issue a temporary permit to the personal representative of the estate of a deceased real estate broker or to another person designated by the commission with the approval of the personal representative of the estate in order to secure proper administration in concluding the affairs of the decedent broker’s real estate business;

issue a temporary permit to a licensee designated by the commission for the purpose of securing proper administration, temporarily managing, or concluding the affairs of the real estate business of a broker if

an investigation produces substantial evidence that the broker has misappropriated trust funds;

the real estate license of the broker is suspended; or

the broker is incapacitated because of a traumatic event or medical condition, as defined in regulations adopted by the commission;

issue a temporary permit to the personal representative of a legally incompetent real estate broker or to another person designated by the commission with the approval of the personal representative of the broker in order to secure proper administration in temporarily managing the real estate business of the broker;

establish and periodically revise the form of the seller’s property disclosure statement required by AS

34.70.010

;

have the authority to levy civil fines as established in this chapter;

revoke the license of a broker, associate broker, or real estate salesperson who is convicted of a felony or other crime committed while licensed under this chapter that, in the judgment of the commission, affects the ability of that person to practice as a broker, associate broker, or real estate salesperson competently and safely or who is convicted of forgery, theft, extortion, conspiracy to defraud creditors, or fraud; notwithstanding AS

08.88.171

, a person whose license is revoked under this paragraph is not qualified to obtain or renew a license under AS

08.88.171

(a) — (c) until seven years have elapsed since the person completed the sentence imposed for the conviction.

When an award is made from the real estate recovery fund under this chapter, the commission may suspend the license of the real estate licensee whose actions formed the basis of the award. A suspension ordered under this subsection shall be lifted if the licensee reaches an agreement with the commission on terms and conditions for the repayment to the real estate recovery fund of the money awarded to the claimant and if the licensee satisfies the requirements of AS

08.88.095

. The suspension shall be reimposed if the licensee violates the terms of a repayment agreement entered into under this subsection.

For the purposes of (a)(3) of this section, the conduct of an employee is attributable to a real estate broker if the real estate broker has actual knowledge that the employee is going to engage in the conduct and agrees to the conduct, either actively or by remaining silent, or ratifies the conduct after it is engaged in.

The commission may investigate a violation of a provision of AS

08.88.600

—

08.88.695

by a real estate licensee and take administrative action under (a)(3) of this section if the commission has reason to believe that a violation has occurred.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am §§ 2, 3 ch 28 SLA 1974; am § 3 ch 143 SLA 1974; am §§ 5, 6 ch 167 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 96 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 150 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 115 SLA 1992; am § 4 ch 45 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 128 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 105 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 51 SLA 2007; am §§ 1, 2 ch 113 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 54 SLA 2009; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1984, in the second sentence of subsection (b), following “lifted if,” the phrase “the commission and” was deleted, and following “salesman,” “reaches” was substituted for “reach” to correct a manifest error. Subsection (c) was formerly AS

08.88.371

.
Renumbered in 1987.

Cross references. —

For other disciplinary powers of the commission, see AS

08.01.075

.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 64, art. 2.

For place of business, see 12 AAC 64, art. 3.

For prohibited conduct, see 12 AAC 64, art. 4.

For trust accounts, see 12 AAC 64, art. 5.

For surety fund claims, see 12 AAC 64, art. 6.

For property management, see 12 AAC 64, art. 9.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 2, ch. 54, SLA 2009, the 2009 amendment of paragraph (a)(11) [formerly (a)(10)] of this section “applies to criminal convictions for offenses occurring before, on, or after October 7, 2009.”

Sec. 08.88.080.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.081.
Commission regulations.

The commission shall adopt regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 7 ch 167 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 105 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For examinations, see 12 AAC 64, art. 1.

For licensing, see 12 AAC 64, art. 2.

For place of business, see 12 AAC 64, art. 3.

For prohibited conduct, see 12 AAC 64, art. 4.

For trust accounts, see 12 AAC 64, art. 5.

For surety fund claims, see 12 AAC 64, art. 6.

For real estate education standards, see 12 AAC 64, art. 7.

For continuing education requirements, see 12 AAC 64, art. 8.

For property management, see 12 AAC 64, art. 9.

Sec. 08.88.090.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.091.
Education of applicants and licensees.

The commission may conduct and assist in conducting real estate clinics, meetings, courses, or institutes. The commission may

assist libraries and educational institutions in sponsoring studies and programs; and

publish informational materials for the purpose of raising the standards of the real estate business and the competency of licensees.

An applicant for licensure under AS

08.88.171(c)

must complete 40 hours of education approved by the commission before the person may be licensed under that subsection.

An applicant for licensure under AS

08.88.171(a)

or (b) shall complete 30 hours of education approved by the commission before the person may be licensed under either of those subsections.

A person who is licensed under this chapter must complete 20 hours of continuing education approved by the commission before the person’s license may be renewed. The commission may not establish limits that prevent a person from satisfying this continuing education requirement within a two-day period.

Except for a course described in (f)(1) or (3) of this section, in order for an educational course to be recognized for credit under this section, AS

08.88.095

, or

08.88.098

, the course outline and the instructor of the course shall have been approved by the commission or the commission’s designee before the course is conducted. A course outline or instructor is considered approved if the commission or the commission’s designee does not disapprove the outline or instructor within 45 days after the date on which complete application was made for approval. Each approved contact hour of a submitted course outline constitutes one credit hour of education under (d) of this section, AS

08.88.095

, or

08.88.098

. The fee for continuing education course certification under AS

08.88.221

and for course certification under AS

08.88.221

to satisfy the educational requirements of AS 08.88.095 and 08.88.098 must be based on the hours approved for credit, not on the hours submitted.

The commission shall establish by regulation the educational and continuing educational requirements for licenses issued by the commission. The regulations for continuing education requirements and for educational requirements under AS

08.88.095

and

08.88.098

must allow the following types of courses to qualify for the appropriate number of credit hours, as determined by the commission:

courses that are developed by national organizations, as identified for the purpose of this paragraph in the commission’s regulations, that are delivered by nationally certified instructors and that are required in order to earn professional designations from a national organization in specialized areas of licensed real estate practice; notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, the commission may not charge a fee for these courses;

technology courses directly related to real estate practice that are designed to enhance the skills and performance of a real estate licensee; and

courses offered by an accredited college or university as part of a real estate curriculum that are available for at least one quarter-hour or one-half semester-hour of academic credit; the commission may not charge a fee for these courses.

The commission shall establish core curricula for continuing education in the following areas: real estate sales, property management, community association management, and commercial sales. A licensee shall complete at least one of the four core curricula during each biennial licensing period as part of the licensee’s continuing education.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 8 ch 167 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 105 SLA 1990; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 45 SLA 1998; am §§ 2, 3 ch 74 SLA 2005; am § 2 ch 51 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 39 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 64, art. 2.

For real estate education standards, see 12 AAC 64, art. 7.

For continuing education requirements, see 12 AAC 64, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (c), substituted “shall” for “must” and “30 hours” for “15 hours”.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 5(a), ch. 39, SLA 2016, the 2016 amendment to subsection (c) "applies to applications for a real estate broker license under AS

08.88.171(a)

or (b) submitted on or after January 1, 2017."

Sec. 08.88.095.
Educational requirements after initial license.

In addition to the continuing educational requirements of AS

08.88.091

(d), within one year after the date that the commission issues an initial license under this chapter, the licensee shall complete 30 hours of education approved by the commission under AS

08.88.091

.

On the document representing an initial license, the commission shall include clear and prominent language stating that the license is subject to the licensee’s completion of the educational requirements within one year after the date of the issuance of the license.

Within 30 days after the end of the one-year period, the licensee shall submit, on a form provided by the commission, a certification that the licensee has completed the educational requirements.

After a licensee submits the completed form under (c) of this section and pays the required fee, the commission shall issue a new license document to the licensee that does not contain the language required by (b) of this section.

If a licensee fails to complete the educational requirements within the one-year period or to provide the certification required by (c) of this section, the license automatically lapses 30 days after the end of the one-year period. However, the commission may reinstate the license under AS

08.88.241

.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, an individual who is issued an initial license as a real estate broker is not required to satisfy the educational requirements for that initial license if, immediately before the issuance, the individual is licensed as an associate real estate broker under this chapter.

In this section, “educational requirements” means the educational requirements of (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 2005; am § 3 ch 51 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 64, art. 2.

For real estate education standards, see 12 AAC 64, art. 7.

Sec. 08.88.098.
Educational requirements after suspension.

In addition to the continuing educational requirements of AS

08.88.091(d)

and the educational requirements of AS

08.88.095(a)

, if the commission suspends a license under AS

08.01.075

, the licensee shall complete the education required by the commission before the commission may reinstate the suspended license.

After completing the educational requirements of (a) of this section, the licensee shall submit, on a form provided by the commission, a certification that the licensee has completed the educational requirements.

The educational requirements of (a) of this section are in addition to any other conditions that the commission sets for reinstating a suspended license under this chapter.

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 2005)

Sec. 08.88.100.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.101.
Administrative duties of the commission. [Repealed, § 9 ch 74 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 08.88.110.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.111.
Commission regulations. [Repealed, § 55 ch 45 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 08.88.120.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.121.
Sale of register. [Repealed, § 9 ch 74 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 08.88.130.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.131.
Applicability of the Administrative Procedure Act.

AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) applies to regulations and proceedings under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964)

Sec. 08.88.140.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.141.
Compensation.

A commission member is entitled to transportation expenses and per diem allowances specified in AS

39.20.180

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964)

Secs. 08.88.150 — 08.88.160.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]